Louisiana, session 2026, HB482.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 17:5027(A)(1) and 5042(1) through (3) are hereby amended and
reenacted and R.S. 17:5002(D)(1)(c) and 5024(D) are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§5002. Awards and amounts
* * *
D.(1) Except as otherwise provided in this Subsection, a student who is
eligible for a TOPS-Tech Award pursuant to this Chapter and who is enrolled:
* * *
(c) In an eligible program at a public college or university, notwithstanding
any provision of this Subsection to the contrary, shall be awarded by the state either
an amount determined by the administering agency to equal the award amount for
that program at that college or university during the 2025-2026 academic year or
four thousand five hundred dollars, whichever is greater. The provisions of this
Subparagraph are applicable to students enrolling as first-time freshmen during or
after the 2026-2027 academic year.
* * *
Page 1 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1206 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 482
§5024. Academic requirements
* * *
D.(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Section to the contrary, a
student who is otherwise eligible for a TOPS-Tech award pursuant to this Chapter
shall qualify for the award if he meets at least two of the following requirements as
determined by the administering agency:
(a) Attainment of a minimum grade point average on the core curriculum as
provided in Subsection A of this Section.
(b) Attainment of a minimum ACT score as provided in Subsection B of this
Section.
(c) Successful completion of either at least nine credit hours of early college
credit, which may be attained through academic or technical dual enrollment courses,
or equivalent validated skills and learning measures as approved by the Statewide
Articulation and Transfer Council.
(2) The provisions of Paragraph (1) of this Subsection are applicable to
students enrolling in an eligible college or university as first-time freshmen during
or after the 2026-2027 academic year.
* * *
§5027. Postsecondary institution enrollment
A.(1)(a) Except as otherwise provided by this Section, to be eligible for an
award pursuant to this Chapter, the student shall enroll in an eligible college or
university as a first-time freshman not later than the semester, excluding summer
semesters or sessions, immediately following the first anniversary of the date that the
student graduated from high school.
(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of Subparagraph (a) of this Paragraph,
a student who is otherwise eligible for a TOPS-Tech award pursuant to this Chapter
may defer his award acceptance and shall retain his award eligibility if he enrolls as
Page 2 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1206 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 482
a first-time freshman in an eligible program at a public college or university prior to
reaching the age of twenty-five.
* * *
§5042. Maintaining eligibility; TOPS-Tech
To maintain continued state payment of any amount pursuant to a TOPS-
Tech Award once enrolled in an institution, a student shall meet all of the following:
(1) Make steady academic progress as defined by the administering agency
toward completion of the requirements of the program in which enrolled, earning not
less than the minimum number of hours of credit required for full-time standing or
the required number of hours needed to complete the program's requirements while
enrolled either part-time or full-time. If at any time a student fails to maintain the
cumulative grade point average required for continuation in the program or as of the
end of any term during the school year fails to make steady academic progress as
defined by the administering agency, the student shall become ineligible for further
payments. Payments may be reinstated upon attainment of the grade point average
required for continuation of the original award and the standards for steady academic
progress as defined by the administering agency, provided that the student has
maintained other continuation requirements and the period of ineligibility did not
persist for more than one year from the date of loss of eligibility. If this one-year
period is interrupted due to a student's active duty service in the United States Armed
Forces, the one-year period shall be extended for a length of time equal to the
student's active duty service, not to exceed four years, unless the student reenlists in
the United States Armed Forces and maintains continuous active duty, in which case
the period shall be extended for a length of time equal to the student's active duty
service; or unless the student is granted an exception for cause by the administering
agency.
(2) Maintain continuous enrollment as a full-time or part-time student unless
granted an exception for cause by the administering agency.
Page 3 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1206 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 482
(3) Have a cumulative grade point average of at least 2.50 2.00 calculated
on a 4.00 scale.
* * *